Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
CHAPTER 1 General Provisions

3-1-1.
Short title.

This title shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Alcoholic Beverage Code.”

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-101, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-1-2.
Definitions.

As used in this title, the term:

“Alcohol” means ethyl alcohol, hydrated oxide of ethyl, or spirits of wine, from whatever source or by whatever process produced.

“Alcoholic beverage” means and includes all alcohol, distilled spirits, beer, malt beverage, wine, or fortified wine.

(2.1)

“Bar” means any premises at which a retailer licensed pursuant to this title to sell alcoholic beverages derives 75 percent or more total annual gross revenue from the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises.

“Brewpub” means any eating establishment in which malt beverages are manufactured, subject to the barrel production limitation prescribed in Code Section 3-5-36. As used in this paragraph, the term “eating establishment” means an establishment which is licensed to sell distilled spirits, malt beverages, or wines and which derives at least 50 percent of its total annual gross food and beverage sales from the sale of prepared meals or food; provided, however, that when determining the total annual gross food and beverage sales, barrels of malt beverages sold to licensed wholesale dealers, as authorized pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of Code Section 3-5-36, or to the public for consumption off the premises, as authorized pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) and paragraph (4) of Code Section 3-5-36, shall not be used.

“Broker” means any person who purchases or obtains an alcoholic beverage from an importer, distillery, brewery, or winery and sells the alcoholic beverage to another broker, importer, or wholesaler without having custody of the alcoholic beverage or maintaining a stock of the alcoholic beverage.

“Commissioner” means the state revenue commissioner.

“County or municipality” means those political subdivisions of this state as defined by law and includes any form of political subdivision consolidating a county with one or more municipalities.

“Department” means the Department of Revenue.

“Distilled spirits” means any alcoholic beverage obtained by distillation or containing more than 24 percent alcohol by volume.

“Fortified wine” means any alcoholic beverage containing not more than 24 percent alcohol by volume made from fruits, berries, or grapes either by natural fermentation or by natural fermentation with brandy added. The term includes, but is not limited to, brandy.

“Gallon” or “wine gallon” means a United States gallon of liquid measure equivalent to the volume of 231 cubic inches or the nearest equivalent metric measurement.

(10.1)

“Hard cider” means an alcoholic beverage obtained by the fermentation of the juice of apples, containing not more than 6 percent alcohol by volume, including, but not limited to, flavored or carbonated cider. For purposes of this title, hard cider shall be deemed a malt beverage. The term does not include “sweet cider.”

“Importer” means any person who imports an alcoholic beverage into this state from a foreign country and sells the alcoholic beverage to another importer, broker, or wholesaler and who maintains a stock of the alcoholic beverage.

“Individual” means a natural person.

“Malt beverage” means any alcoholic beverage obtained by the fermentation of any infusion or decoction of barley, malt, hops, or any other similar product, or any combination of such products in water, containing not more than 14 percent alcohol by volume and including ale, porter, brown, stout, lager beer, small beer, and strong beer. The term does not include sake, known as Japanese rice wine.

“Manufacturer” means any maker, producer, or bottler of an alcoholic beverage. The term also means:

In the case of distilled spirits, any person engaged in distilling, rectifying, or blending any distilled spirits; provided, however, that a vintner that blends wine with distilled spirits to produce a fortified wine shall not be considered a manufacturer of distilled spirits;

In the case of malt beverages, any brewer; and

In the case of wine, any vintner.

“Military reservation” means a duly commissioned post, camp, base, or station of a branch of the armed forces of the United States located on territory within this state which has been ceded to the United States.

“Package” means a bottle, can, keg, barrel, or other original consumer container.

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, cooperative, nonprofit membership corporation, joint venture, association, company, corporation, agency, syndicate, estate, trust, business trust, receiver, fiduciary, or other group or combination acting as a unit, body politic, or political subdivision, whether public, private, or quasi-public.

“Retail consumption dealer” means any person who sells distilled spirits for consumption on the premises at retail only to consumers and not for resale.

“Retailer” or “retail dealer” means, except as to distilled spirits, any person who sells alcoholic beverages, either in unbroken packages or for consumption on the premises, at retail only to consumers and not for resale. With respect to distilled spirits, the term shall have the same meaning as the term “retail package liquor store.”

(19.1)

“Retail package liquor store” means a retail business establishment owned by an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other business entity:

Primarily engaged in the retail sale of distilled spirits, malt beverages, and wine in unbroken packages, not for consumption on the premises, except as authorized under this chapter; and

Which derives from such retail sale of alcoholic beverages in unbroken packages at least 75 percent of its total annual gross sales from the sale of a combination of distilled spirits, malt beverages, and wine.

“Shipper” means any person who ships an alcoholic beverage from outside this state.

“Standard case” means six containers of 1.75 liters, 12 containers of 750 milliliters, 12 containers of one liter, 24 containers of 500 milliliters, 24 containers of 375 milliliters, 48 containers of 200 milliliters, or 120 containers of 50 milliliters.

“Taxpayer” means any person made liable by law to file a return or to pay tax.

“Wholesaler” or “wholesale dealer” means any person who sells alcoholic beverages to other wholesale dealers, to retail dealers, or to retail consumption dealers.

“Wine” means any alcoholic beverage containing not more than 24 percent alcohol by volume made from fruits, berries, or grapes either by natural fermentation or by natural fermentation with brandy added. The term includes, but is not limited to, all sparkling wines, champagnes, combinations of such beverages, vermouths, special natural wines, rectified wines, and like products. The term does not include cooking wine mixed with salt or other ingredients so as to render it unfit for human consumption as a beverage. A liquid shall first be deemed to be a wine at that point in the manufacturing process when it conforms to the definition of wine contained in this Code section.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-102, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1994, p. 553, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 734, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1581, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 584, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 206, § 1/HB 1248; Ga. L. 2012, p. 680, § 1/HB 472; Ga. L. 2013, p. 767, § 2/HB 124; Ga. L. 2014, p. 366, § 1/SB 286; Ga. L. 2015, p. 317, § 1/SB 63; Ga. L. 2015, p. 578, § 1/HB 152; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 3/SB 365.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 03.23.20.01, 04.23.20.02, 05.12.20.02, 05.28.20.02, 06.11.20.01, 06.29.20.02, 07.15.20.01, 07.31.20.02, 08.15.20.01, 08.31.20.02, 09.15.20.01, 09.30.20.02, 10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02, 11.13.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 1.15.21.01, 1.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01, 3.31.21.03, and 04.30.21.01.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in the first sentence of paragraph (10.1).

Cross references.

General powers and duties of commissioner, §

48-2-7

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, paragraphs (22) and (23) were redesignated as paragraphs (23) and (22), respectively.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, a minor punctuation change was made at the end of paragraph (10.1).

3-1-3.
Use of existing forms and filings relating to licenses or taxes.

Every form of license or tax document or other license or tax related filing lawfully in use immediately prior to July 1, 1981, may continue to be so used or be effective until the commissioner, in accordance with this title, otherwise prescribes.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-104, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 206, § 2/HB 1248.

3-1-4.
Penalty for violations of provisions of title.

It is unlawful for any person knowingly and intentionally to violate any criminal prohibition contained in this title.

Except as otherwise provided in this title, any person who violates any criminal prohibition contained in this title shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-9904, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1.

3-1-5.
Posting of warning by retailer that consumption of alcohol during pregnancy is dangerous.

All retail consumption dealers and retail dealers in this state who sell at retail any alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises shall post, in a conspicuous place, a sign which clearly reads: “Warning: Drinking alcoholic beverages during pregnancy can cause birth defects.”

The department shall make such warning signs available to such retailers of alcoholic beverages and shall promulgate rules and regulations with respect to the form and the posting of said signs. A fee may be charged by the department to cover printing, postage, and handling expenses.

Any person who fails or refuses to post the sign as required in this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined in an amount not to exceed $100.00 for each violation.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-1-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 618, § 1.